Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1731
Bonds; consolidation.

If the acquisition agent, sales agent, and management agent are under the control of, subsidiary of, or affiliate of the developer or any other person, the bonds required by sections 76-1728 to 76-1730 may be consolidated and reduced to ten thousand dollars if there is a disclosure of the affiliation and the disclosures required by sections 76-1728 to 76-1730.

Laws 1980, LB 945, § 31.